Utah statutes.
7-18a-205.   Amended certificate of authority to establish an agency, branch, or representative office.

(1)  A foreign depository institution authorized by this state to transact business in this state through an agency, branch, or representative office shall secure an amended certificate of authority if it:

(a)  changes its corporate name;

(b)  changes the duration of its corporate existence; or

(c)  desires to expand or contract the purposes set forth in the foreign depository institution's prior application for certificate of authority.

(2)  An application for an amended certificate of authority shall be filed with the department in a form prescribed by the commissioner.



Enacted by Chapter 63, 1996 General Session

